Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 17.4986, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Licensed facilities. (a) The commissioner shall issue transportation permits to import: (1) indigenous and naturalized species except trout, salmon, catfish, or species on the VHS-susceptible-species list and sperm from any source to a standard facility; (2) trout, salmon, catfish, or species on the VHS-susceptible-species list from a nonemergency enzootic disease area to a containment facility if the fish are certified within the previous year to be free of certifiable diseases, except that eggs deleted text begin with enteric redmouth, whirling disease, or furunculosisdeleted text end new text begin from sources that test positive for Yersinia ruckeri, Myxobolus cerebralis, Tetracapsuloides bryosalmonae, Aeromonas salmonicida, epizootic epitheliotropic disease virus, or viral hemorrhagic septicemianew text end may be imported following treatment approved by the commissioner, and fish deleted text begin with bacterial kidney disease or viral hemorrhagic septicemiadeleted text end new text begin or eggs from sources that test positive for Renibacterium salmoninarumnew text end may be imported into areas where the deleted text begin diseasedeleted text end new text begin pathogennew text end has been identified as being present; and (3) trout, salmon, catfish, or species on the VHS-susceptible-species list from a facility in a nonemergency enzootic disease area with a disease-free history of three years or more to a standard facility, except that eggs deleted text begin with enteric redmouth, whirling disease, or furunculosisdeleted text end new text begin from sources that test positive for Yersinia ruckeri, Myxobolus cerebralis, Tetracapsuloides bryosalmonae, Aeromonas salmonicida, epizootic epitheliotropic disease virus, or viral hemorrhagic septicemianew text end may be imported following treatment approved by the commissioner, and fish deleted text begin with bacterial kidney disease or viral hemorrhagic septicemiadeleted text end new text begin or eggs from sources that test positive for Renibacterium salmoninarumnew text end may be imported into areas where the deleted text begin diseasedeleted text end new text begin pathogennew text end has been identified as being present. (b) If a source facility in a nonemergency enzootic disease area cannot demonstrate a history free from disease, aquatic life may only be imported into a quarantine facility. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 17.4986, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Emergency enzootic disease area. new text begin (a) new text end Except as new text begin provided under paragraph (b) and as new text end otherwise provided deleted text begin and except that eggs with enteric redmouth, whirling disease, or furunculosis may be imported following treatment approved by the commissioner, and fish with bacterial kidney disease may be imported into areas where the disease has been previously introduceddeleted text end , fish may be imported from emergency enzootic disease areas only as fertilized eggs under the following conditions: (1) to be imported into a standard facility, fertilized eggs must have a disease-free history for at least five years; (2) to be imported into a containment facility, fertilized eggs must have a disease-free history for at least three years; or (3) to be imported into a quarantine facility, fertilized eggs may have a disease-free history of less than three years. new text begin (b) Eggs from sources that test positive for Yersinia ruckeri, Myxobolus cerebralis, Tetracapsuloides bryosalmonae, Aeromonas salmonicida, epizootic epitheliotropic disease virus, or viral hemorrhagic septicemia may be imported following treatment approved by the commissioner. Fish or eggs from sources that test positive for Renibacterium salmoninarum may be imported into areas where the pathogen has been identified as being present. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 17.4987, is amended to read: 17.4987 STOCKING PRIVATE AQUATIC LIFE. (a) A person may not release private aquatic life into public waters that are not licensed as part of an aquatic farm without first obtaining a transportation permit from the commissioner. The commissioner may: (1) deny issuance of a permit if releasing the private aquatic life is not consistent with the management plan for the public waters; and (2) approve the import, transport, and stocking of fish deleted text begin with bacterial kidney disease or viral hemorrhagic septicemiadeleted text end new text begin or eggs from sources that test positive for Renibacterium salmoninarumnew text end into areas or waters where deleted text begin either diseasedeleted text end new text begin the pathogennew text end has been identified as being present. (b) The commissioner shall make management plans available to the public. (c) If a permit is denied, the commissioner must provide reasons for the denial in writing. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 17.4992, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Restriction on the sale of fish. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), species on the VHS-susceptible-species list must be free of viral hemorrhagic septicemia and species of the family salmonidae or ictaluridae, except bullheads, must be free of certifiable diseases if sold for stocking or transfer to another aquatic farm. (b) The following exceptions apply to paragraph (a): (1) eggs deleted text begin with enteric redmouth, whirling disease, or furunculosisdeleted text end new text begin from sources that test positive for Yersinia ruckeri, Myxobolus cerebralis, Tetracapsuloides bryosalmonae, Aeromonas salmonicida, epizootic epitheliotropic disease virus, or viral hemorrhagic septicemianew text end may be transferred between licensed facilities deleted text begin or stockeddeleted text end following treatment approved by the commissioner; (2) fish deleted text begin with bacterial kidney disease or viral hemorrhagic septicemiadeleted text end new text begin or eggs from sources that test positive for Renibacterium salmoninarumnew text end may be transferred between licensed facilities or stocked in areas where the deleted text begin diseasedeleted text end new text begin pathogennew text end has been identified as being present; and (3) the commissioner may allow transfer between licensed facilities or stocking of fish deleted text begin with enteric redmouth or furunculosisdeleted text end new text begin from facilities that test positive for Yersinia ruckeri or Aeromonas salmonicidanew text end when the commissioner determines that doing so would pose no threat to the state's aquatic resources.